Nevada, session 83, SB106.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 488.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.600 Every owner, operator or person in command of any
vessel is guilty of a misdemeanor who operates it or permits it to be
operated at a speed in excess of 5 nautical miles per hour in any of
the following areas:
1. Within 100 feet of any person who is engaged in the act of
bathing, wading, diving, floating or swimming.
2. Within 200 feet of any:
(a) Beach frequented by persons who engage in the acts of
bathing, wading, diving, floating or swimming.
(b) Swimming float, diving platform or lifeline.
(c) Way or landing float to which vessels are made fast or which
is used for the embarkation or discharge of passengers.
3. Within 600 feet of the shoreline of Lake Tahoe.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 2. NRS 277.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
277.215 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
every game warden, sheriff and other peace officer of this state and
its political subdivisions may issue one or more of the following:
(a) Educational material provided by the Tahoe Regional
Planning Agency;
(b) An oral advisory; or
(c) A warning citation,
 to a person who violates, within the portion of the region that is
within the waters of this state, section [54.16(A), 54.16(B)]
60.1.3(E) or [81.2(E)] 84.10 of the Code of Ordinances adopted by
the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency and in effect on [April 1,
1999.] August 25, 2024.
2. A game warden, sheriff or other peace officer who issues a
warning citation pursuant to subsection 1 shall report the name and
address of the person to whom such warning was issued to the
Tahoe Regional Planning Agency.
3. An agency that provides law enforcement or other public
safety services is not subject to the provisions of section [54.16(A),
54.16(B)] 60.1.3(E) or [81.2(E)] 84.10 of the Code of Ordinances
adopted by the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency and in effect on
[April 1, 1999,] August 25, 2024, when performing its official
duties during an emergency or disaster on the waters of Lake Tahoe
if such duties are performed in an effort to protect life or property.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Region” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 277.200.
(b) “Waters of this state” means any waters within the territorial
limits of this state.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)